Alabama, session 2026rs, SB145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
11 Section 1. Sections 40-26B-71, 40-26B-73, 40-26B-77.1,
12 40-26B-79, 40-26B-80, 40-26B-81, 40-26B-82, 40-26B-84, and
13 40-26B-88, Code of Alabama 1975, as last amended by Act
14 2025-371, 2025 Regular Session, are amended as follows:
15 "§40-26B-71
16 (a) For state fiscal years 2026, 2027, and 2028, anAn
17 assessment is imposed on each privately operated hospital in
18 the amount of 6.00 percent of net patient revenue. For state
19 fiscal year 2026, the determination of net patient revenue
20 shall be based on the cost report for in fiscal year 2023,
21 which shall be reviewed and hospital cost reports shall be
22 reviewed and updated annually, subject to limitations in this
23 article on the use of funds in the Hospital Assessment
24 Account. The assessment is a cost of doing business as a
25 privately operated hospital in the State of Alabama. Annually,
26 the Medicaid Agency shall make a determination of whether
27 changes in federal law or regulation have adversely affected
28 hospital Medicaid reimbursement during the most recently
Page 1

hospital Medicaid reimbursement during the most recently
SB145 Enrolled
29 completed fiscal year, or a reduction in payment rates has
30 occurred. If the agency determines that adverse impact to
31 hospital Medicaid reimbursement has occurred, or will occur,
32 the agency shall report its findings to the Chair of the House
33 Ways and Means General Fund Committee who shall propose an
34 amendment to this article during any legislative session prior
35 to the start of the upcoming fiscal year from the year the
36 report was made, to address the adverse impact. The assessment
37 imposed on each private hospital under this section shall be
38 reduced pro rata, if the total disproportionate share
39 allotment for all hospitals is reduced before or during the
40 2028current fiscal year, as a result of any action by the
41 Medicaid Agency or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
42 Services, and only to the extent that the Hospital Assessment
43 Account is more than necessary to fund some or all hospital
44 payments under this article.
45 (b)(1) For state fiscal years 2026, 2027, and 2028,
46 netNet patient revenue shall be determined using the data from
47 each private hospital's fiscal year ending 2023, 2024, or 2025
48 Medicare Cost Report contained in the Centers for Medicare and
49 Medicaid Services' Healthcare Cost Report Information System,
50 which shall be reviewed and the hospital cost reports updated
51 annually subject to limitations in this article on the use of
52 funds in the Hospital Assessment Account. The Medicare Cost
53 Report for 2023, 2024, and 2025 for each private hospital,
54 which shall be reviewed and updated annually, shall be used
55 for fiscal years 2026, 2027, and 2028, respectively, and this
56 schedule shall be carried forward in like manner for future
Page 2

schedule shall be carried forward in like manner for future
SB145 Enrolled
57 years. If the Medicare Cost Report is not available in the
58 Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services' Healthcare Cost
59 Report Information System, the hospital shall submit a copy to
60 the department to determine the hospital's net patient revenue
61 for the most recent fiscal year.
62 (2) If a privately operated hospital commenced
63 operations after the due date for a 2023 Medicare Cost Report
64 as provided in subsection (b)(1), the hospital shall submit
65 its most recent Medicare Cost Report to the department in
66 order to allow the department to determine the hospital's net
67 patient revenue.
68 (c) This article does not authorize a unit of county or
69 local government to license for revenue or impose a tax or
70 assessment upon hospitals or a tax or assessment measured by
71 the income or earnings of a hospital."
72 "§40-26B-73
73 (a)(1) There is created within the Health Care Trust
74 Fund referenced in Article 3 of Chapter 6 of Title 22 a
75 designated account known as the Hospital Assessment Account.
76 (2) The hospital assessments imposed under this article
77 shall be deposited into the Hospital Assessment Account.
78 (b) Monies in the Hospital Assessment Account shall
79 consist of:
80 (1) All monies collected or received by the department
81 from privately operated hospital assessments imposed under
82 this article;
83 (2) Any interest or penalties levied in conjunction
84 with the administration of this article; and
Page 3

with the administration of this article; and
SB145 Enrolled
85 (3) Any appropriations, transfers, donations, gifts, or
86 monies from other sources, as applicable.
87 (c) The Hospital Assessment Account shall be separate
88 and distinct from the State General Fund and shall be
89 supplementary to the Health Care Trust Fund.
90 (d) Monies in the Hospital Assessment Account shall not
91 be used to replace other general revenues appropriated and
92 funded by the Legislature or other revenues used to support
93 Medicaid.
94 (e) The Hospital Assessment Account shall be exempt
95 from budgetary cuts, reductions, or eliminations caused by a
96 deficiency of State General Fund revenues to the extent
97 permissible under Section 213 of the Constitution of Alabama
98 of 2022.
99 (f)(1) Except as necessary to reimburse any funds
100 borrowed to supplement funds in the Hospital Assessment
101 Account, the monies in the Hospital Assessment Account shall
102 be used only as follows:
103 a. To make public, private, and state inpatient and
104 outpatient hospital payments.
105 b. To reimburse monies collected by the department from
106 hospitals through error or mistake or under this article.
107 (2)a. The Hospital Assessment Account shall retain
108 account balances remaining each fiscal year.
109 b. On September 30, 2014, and each year thereafter, any
110 positive balance remaining in the Hospital Assessment Account
111 which was not used by the Medicaid Agency to obtain federal
112 matching funds and paid out for hospital payments, shall be
Page 4

matching funds and paid out for hospital payments, shall be
SB145 Enrolled
113 factored into the calculation of any new assessment rate by
114 reducing the amount of hospital assessment funds that must be
115 generated during the next fiscal year. The Medicaid Agency may
116 carry over a balance of unspent assessment funds not
117 considered in the previous sentence and not to exceed
118 one-third of the total current year's assessment, through
119 fiscal year 2028 to account for future variations in hospital
120 expenses and federal match rates in the upcoming fiscal year.
121 If there is no new assessment beginning October 1, 2028, the
122 funds remaining shall be refunded to the hospital that paid
123 the assessment or made an intergovernmental transfer in
124 proportion to the amount remaining.
125 (3) A privately operated hospital shall not be
126 guaranteed that its inpatient and outpatient hospital payments
127 will equal or exceed the amount of its hospital assessment."
128 "§40-26B-77.1
129 (a) Beginning on October 1, 2016, and ending on
130 September 30, 2028, publiclyPublicly owned and state-owned
131 hospitals shall begin makingmake intergovernmental transfers
132 to the Alabama Medicaid Agency. Total IGTs for the total
133 intergovernmental transfers shall equal the amount of state
134 funds necessary for the agency to obtain only those federal
135 matching funds necessary to pay publicly owned and state-owned
136 hospitals for hospital payments.
137 (b) These intergovernmental transfers shall be made in
138 compliance with 42 U.S.C. § 1396b(w).
139 (c) If a publicly or state-owned hospital commences
140 operations after October 1, 2013, the hospital shall commence
Page 5

operations after October 1, 2013, the hospital shall commence
SB145 Enrolled
141 making intergovernmental transfers to the Alabama Medicaid
142 Agency in the first full month of operation of the hospital
143 after October 1, 2013."
144 "§40-26B-79
145 The agency shall pay hospitals, as a base amount for
146 fiscal years 2026, 2027, and 2028, the greater of a hospital's
147 current per diem as published for fiscal year 2022 or 68
148 percent of total inpatient payments made by the agency during
149 state fiscal year 2019, divided by the total patient days paid
150 in state fiscal year 2019, multiplied by patient days paid
151 during the current fiscal yearfiscal years 2026, 2027, and
152 2028. A hospital may request to have their per diem reviewed
153 and revised at the sole discretion of the Medicaid Agency.
154 This payment to be paid using the agency's published check
155 write table is in addition to any hospital access payments the
156 agency may elect to pay hospitals as inpatient payments other
157 than per diems and access payments, if the agency does not
158 make payments pursuant to Article 9 of Chapter 6 of Title 22
159 in fiscal year 2019, or fiscal years 2026, 2027, and 2028 and
160 thereafter, only if the Hospital Services and Reimbursement
161 Panel approves the change in hospital payments."
162 "§40-26B-80
163 If the Alabama Medicaid Agency implements OPPS, the
164 total amount budgeted (total base rate) for OPPS shall not be
165 less than the total outpatient UPL.
166 The agency shall pay hospitals as a base amount for
167 fiscal years 2026, 2027, and 2028 for outpatient services,
168 based upon an outpatient fee schedule in existence on
Page 6

based upon an outpatient fee schedule in existence on
SB145 Enrolled
169 September 30, 2018. Medicaid may update the outpatient fee
170 schedule with approval of the Hospital Services and
171 Reimbursement Panel. Hospital outpatient base payments shall
172 be in addition to any hospital access payments or other
173 payments described in this article."
174 "§40-26B-81
175 (a) The agency shall consider the published inpatient
176 and outpatient rates as defined in Sections 40-26B-79 and
177 40-26B-80 as the minimum payment allowed.
178 (b) The aggregate hospital access payment amount is an
179 amount equal to the upper payment limit, less total hospital
180 base payments determined under this article. All publicly,
181 state-owned, and privately operated hospitals shall be
182 eligible for inpatient and outpatient hospital access payments
183 for fiscal years 2026, 2027, and 2028, as set forth in this
184 article.
185 (1) In addition to any other funds paid to hospitals
186 for inpatient hospital services to Medicaid patients, each
187 eligible hospital shall receive inpatient hospital access
188 payments each state fiscal year. Publicly and state-owned
189 hospitals shall receive total payments, including hospital
190 base payments, that, in the aggregate, equal the upper payment
191 limit for publicly and state-owned hospitals, until the
192 Hospital Assessment Account is exhausted. Privately operated
193 hospitals shall receive total payments, including hospital
194 base payments that, in the aggregate, equal the upper payment
195 limit for privately operated hospitals, until the Hospital
196 Assessment Account is exhausted. Any intergovernmental
Page 7

Assessment Account is exhausted. Any intergovernmental
SB145 Enrolled
197 transfers and hospital provider taxes shall be used only as
198 monies paid to hospitals.
199 (2) Inpatient hospital access payments shall be made on
200 a quarterly basis.
201 (3) In addition to any other funds paid to hospitals
202 for outpatient hospital services to Medicaid patients, each
203 eligible hospital shall receive outpatient hospital access
204 payments each state fiscal year. Publicly and state-owned
205 hospitals shall receive payments, including hospital base
206 payments, that, in the aggregate, equal the upper payment
207 limit for publicly and state-owned hospitals, until the
208 Hospital Assessment Account is exhausted. Privately operated
209 hospitals shall receive payments, including hospital base
210 payments, that, in the aggregate, equal the upper payment
211 limit for privately operated hospitals, until the Hospital
212 Assessment Account is exhausted.
213 (4) Outpatient hospital access payments shall be made
214 on a quarterly basis.
215 (c) A hospital access payment shall not be used to
216 offset any other payment by the Medicaid Agency for hospital
217 inpatient or outpatient services to Medicaid beneficiaries,
218 including, without limitation, any fee-for-service, per diem,
219 private or public hospital inpatient adjustment, or hospital
220 cost settlement payment.
221 (d) The specific hospital payments for publicly,
222 state-owned, and privately operated hospitals shall be
223 described in the state plan amendment to be submitted to and
224 approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services."
Page 8

approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services."
SB145 Enrolled
225 "§40-26B-82
226 (a) The assessment imposed under this article shall not
227 take effect or shall cease to be imposed and any monies
228 remaining in the Hospital Assessment Account in the Alabama
229 Medicaid Program Trust Fund shall be refunded to hospitals in
230 proportion to the amounts paid by them if any of the following
231 occur:
232 (1) Expenditures for hospital inpatient and outpatient
233 services paid for by the Alabama Medicaid Program for fiscal
234 years 2026, 2027, and 2028 for the current fiscal year are
235 less than the amount paid during fiscal year 2017 or
236 reimbursement rates under this article for fiscal years 2026,
237 2027, and 2028 are less than the rates approved by CMS in
238 Sections 40-26B-79 and 40-26B-80.
239 (2) The Alabama Medicaid Agency makes changes in rules
240 that reduce hospital inpatient payment rates, outpatient
241 payment rates, or adjustment payments, including any cost
242 settlement protocol, which were in effect on September 30,
243 2025.
244 (3) The inpatient or outpatient hospital access
245 payments required under this article are changed or the
246 assessments imposed or certified public expenditures or
247 intergovernmental transfers recognized under this article are
248 not eligible for federal matching funds under Title XIX of the
249 Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., or 42 U.S.C. §
250 1397aa et seq.
251 (4) The Alabama Medicaid Agency contracts with an
252 alternate care provider in a Medicaid region under any terms
Page 9

alternate care provider in a Medicaid region under any terms
SB145 Enrolled
253 other than the following:
254 a. The agency may contract with an alternate care
255 provider only if, in the judgment of the agency, care of
256 Medicaid enrollees would be better, more efficient, and less
257 costly than under the then existing care delivery system. The
258 agency may contract with more than one alternate care provider
259 in a Medicaid region.
260 b. If the agency were to contract with an alternate
261 care provider under the terms of this subdivision, that
262 provider would have to pay reimbursements for hospital
263 inpatient or outpatient care at rates at least equal to the
264 most recent published rates pursuant to Sections 40-26B-79 and
265 40-26B-80.
266 c. If more than a year had elapsed since the agency
267 directly paid reimbursements to hospitals, the minimum
268 reimbursement rates paid by the alternate care provider would
269 have to be changed to reflect any percentage increase in the
270 national medical consumer price index minus 100 basis points.
271 (b)(1) The assessment imposed under this article shall
272 not take effect or shall cease to be imposed if the assessment
273 is determined to be an impermissible tax under Title XIX of
274 the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.
275 (2) Monies in the Hospital Assessment Account in the
276 Alabama Medicaid Program Trust Fund derived from assessments
277 imposed before the determination described in subdivision (1)
278 shall be disbursed under this article to the extent federal
279 matching is not reduced due to the impermissibility of the
280 assessments, and any remaining monies shall be refunded to
Page 10

assessments, and any remaining monies shall be refunded to
SB145 Enrolled
281 hospitals in proportion to the amounts paid by them."
282 "§40-26B-84
283 This article shall be of no effect if federal financial
284 participation under Title XIX of the Social Security Act is
285 not available to the Medicaid Agency at the approved federal
286 medical assistance percentage, established under Section 1905
287 of the Social Security Act, now appearing as 42 U.S.C. §
288 1369d, for the state fiscal years 2026, 2027, and 2028."
289 Section 2. Section 40-26B-88, Code of Alabama 1975,
290 relating to the termination of the Hospital Provider Privilege
291 Tax, is repealed.
292 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
293 1, 2026.
Page 11

1, 2026.
SB145 Enrolled
294
295
296
297
298
299
300 ________________________________________________
301 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
302
303
304
305 ________________________________________________
306 Speaker of the House of Representatives
307
308
309 SB145
310 Senate 11-Mar-26
311 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
312 the Senate, as amended.
313
314 Patrick Harris,
315 Secretary.
316
317
318
319
320 House of Representatives
321 Passed: 01-Apr-26
322
323
324
325
326 By: Senator Albritton
Page 12